District of Columbia statutes.
22-3308

Repealed

Cutting down or destroying things growing on or attached to the land of another.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1327, ch. 854, § 847
Aug. 12, 1937, 50 Stat. 629, ch. 599
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(p), 41 DCR 2608
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-309, § 202, 50 DCR 888
1981 Ed., § 22-3108.
1973 Ed., § 22-3108.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(p) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7(b) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, October 25, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).